algorithms/pali.sbl
/*
Pāli Stemmer

The romanized Pāli alphabet:

a ā i ī u ū e o ṁ ṃ k kh g gh ṅ c ch j jh ñ ṭ ṭh ḍ ḍh ṇ t th d dh n p ph b bh m y r l ḷ v s h

Sanskrit letters may occur:

ṛ ṣ ś

In dictionary texts, √ is used to mark roots.
*/

routines (
    mark_regions
    R1
    declensions
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( p1 )
groupings ( vowel consonant )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters */

stringdef aa  '{U+0101}' // ā
stringdef ii  '{U+012B}' // ī
stringdef uu  '{U+016B}' // ū
stringdef m'  '{U+1E41}' // ṁ
stringdef m.  '{U+1E43}' // ṃ
stringdef n'  '{U+1E45}' // ṅ
stringdef n~  '{U+00F1}' // ñ
stringdef t.  '{U+1E6D}' // ṭ
stringdef d.  '{U+1E0D}' // ḍ
stringdef n.  '{U+1E47}' // ṇ
stringdef l.  '{U+1E37}' // ḷ
stringdef r.  '{U+1E5B}' // ṛ
stringdef s.  '{U+1E63}' // ṣ
stringdef s'  '{U+015B}' // ś
stringdef vr  '{U+221A}' // √

define vowel 'a{aa}i{ii}u{uu}eo'

define consonant '{m'}{m.}kg{n'}cj{n~}{t.}{d.}{n.}tdnpbmyrl{l.}vsh{r.}{s.}{s'}{vr}'

define mark_regions as (

    $p1 = limit

    (vowel goto non-vowel
        among('kh' 'gh' 'ch' 'jh' '{t.}h' '{d.}h' 'th' 'dh' 'ph' 'bh') or next
        setmark p1)
    or

    (non-vowel gopast vowel setmark p1)
)

backwardmode (

    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor

    // Remove declension endings for masc., neut., fem. nouns.
    // Start with the longer endings to avoid ambiguity.
    // Some endings are present in other noun types, and remain ambiguous.
    // bhūmīnaṁ → bhūmi is OK, but kumārīnaṁ → kumāri should be kumārī.
    // The result (kumāri) is nonetheless suitable for dictionary lookup.

    define declensions as (
        [substring] R1 among (
            // masc.-a 5 chars
            'asmi{m'}'
            'asmi{m.}'
            (<- 'a')

            // masc.-i 5 chars
            'ismi{m'}'
            'ismi{m.}'
            (<- 'i')

            // masc.-u 5 chars
            'usmi{m'}'
            'usmi{m.}'
            (<- 'u')

            // masc.-a 4 chars
            '{aa}na{m'}'
            '{aa}na{m.}'
            'amh{aa}'
            'amhi'
            'asm{aa}'
            'assa'
            (<- 'a')

            // fem.-ā 4 chars
            '{aa}ya{m'}'
            '{aa}ya{m.}'
            '{aa}yo'
            (<- '{aa}')

            // masc.-i 4 chars
            '{ii}na{m'}'
            '{ii}na{m.}'
            'imh{aa}'
            'imhi'
            'ism{aa}'
            'issa'
            (<- 'i')

            // fem.-i 4 chars
            'iya{m'}'
            'iya{m.}'
            (<- 'i')

            // masc.-ī 4 chars
            'ina{m'}'
            'ina{m.}'
            (<- '{ii}')

            // masc.-u 4 chars
            'umh{aa}'
            'umhi'
            'usm{aa}'
            'ussa'
            '{uu}na{m'}'
            '{uu}na{m.}'
            (<- 'u')

            // fem.-u 4 chars
            'uya{m'}'
            'uya{m.}'
            (<- 'u')

            // masc.-a 3 chars
            '{aa}ya'
            'ehi'
            'ena'
            'esu'
            (<- 'a')

            // fem.-ā 3 chars
            '{aa}hi'
            '{aa}su'
            (<- '{aa}')

            // neut.-a 3 chars
            '{aa}ni'
            (<- 'a')

            // masc.-i 3 chars
            'ayo'
            '{ii}hi'
            '{ii}su'
            'in{aa}'
            'ino'
            (<- 'i')

            // neut.-i 3 chars
            '{ii}ni'
            'ini'
            'isu'
            (<- 'i')

            // fem.-i 3 chars
            'iy{aa}'
            'iyo'
            (<- 'i')

            // masc.-u 3 chars
            'ave'
            'avo'
            'un{aa}'
            'uno'
            '{uu}hi'
            '{uu}su'
            (<- 'u')

            // neut.-u 3 chars
            '{uu}ni'
            (<- 'u')

            // fem.-u 3 chars
            'usu'
            'uy{aa}'
            'uyo'
            (<- 'u')

            // masc.-a 2 chars
            'a{m'}'
            'a{m.}'
            (<- 'a')

            // masc.-i 2 chars
            'i{m'}'
            'i{m.}'
            (<- 'i')

            // masc.-u 2 chars
            'u{m'}'
            'u{m.}'
            (<- 'u')

            // masc.-a 1 chars
            'o'
            '{aa}'
            'e'
            (<- 'a')

            // masc.-i 1 chars
            '{ii}'
            (<- 'i')

            // masc.-u 1 chars
            '{uu}'
            (<- 'u')

        )
    )

)

define stem as (
    do mark_regions
    backwards (
        do declensions
    )
)
